Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Reporting Abuse of Children
§ 4916b.
Human Services Board hearing.

Within 30 days after the date on which the administrative reviewer mailed notice of placement of a report on the Registry, the person who is the subject of the substantiation may apply in writing to the Human Services Board for relief. The Board shall hold a fair hearing pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 3091

. When the Department receives notice of the appeal, it shall make note in the Registry record that the substantiation has been appealed to the Board.

The Board shall hold a hearing within 60 days after the receipt of the request for a hearing and shall issue a decision within 30 days after the hearing.
(b) (1) The Board shall hold a hearing within 60 days after the receipt of the request for a hearing and shall issue a decision within 30 days after the hearing.

Priority shall be given to appeals in which there are immediate employment consequences for the person appealing the decision.

Article VIII of the Vermont Rules of Evidence (Hearsay) shall not apply to any hearing held pursuant to this subchapter with respect to statements made by a child 12 years of age or under who is alleged to have been abused or neglected and the child shall not be required to testify or give evidence at any hearing held under this subchapter. Evidence shall be admissible if the time, content, and circumstances of the statements provide substantial indicia of trustworthiness.
(3) (A) Article VIII of the Vermont Rules of Evidence (Hearsay) shall not apply to any hearing held pursuant to this subchapter with respect to statements made by a child 12 years of age or under who is alleged to have been abused or neglected and the child shall not be required to testify or give evidence at any hearing held under this subchapter. Evidence shall be admissible if the time, content, and circumstances of the statements provide substantial indicia of trustworthiness.

Article VIII of the Vermont Rules of Evidence (Hearsay) shall not apply to any hearing held pursuant to this subchapter with respect to statements made by a child who is at least 13 years of age and under 16 years of age who is alleged to have been abused or neglected and the child shall not be required to testify or give evidence at any hearing held under this subchapter in either of the following circumstances:

The hearing officer determines, based on a preponderance of the evidence, that requiring the child to testify will present a substantial risk of trauma to the child. Evidence of trauma need not be offered by an expert and may be offered by any adult with an ongoing significant relationship with the child. Evidence shall be admissible if the time, content, and circumstances of the statements provide substantial indicia of trustworthiness.

The hearing officer determines that the child is physically unavailable to testify or the Department has made diligent efforts to locate the child and was unsuccessful. Evidence shall be admissible if the time, content, and circumstances of the statements provide substantial indicia of trustworthiness.

Convictions and adjudications that arose out of the same incident of abuse or neglect for which the person was substantiated, whether by verdict, by judgment, or by a plea of any type, including a plea resulting in a deferred sentence, shall be competent evidence in a hearing held under this subchapter.

A hearing may be stayed upon request of the petitioner if there is a related case pending in the Criminal or Family Division of the Superior Court that arose out of the same incident of abuse or neglect for which the person was substantiated.

If no review by the Board is requested, the Department’s decision in the case shall be final, and the person shall have no further right for review under this section. The Board may grant a waiver and permit such a review upon good cause shown.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2007; amended

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2009, No. 1

, § 29;

2009, No. 1

54

(Adj. Sess.), § 222;

2017, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4916c.
Petition for expungement from the Registry.

Except as provided in this subdivision, a person whose name has been placed on the Registry prior to July 1, 2009 and has been listed on the Registry for at least three years may file a written request with the Commissioner, seeking a review for the purpose of expunging an individual Registry record. A person whose name has been placed on the Registry on or after July 1, 2009 and has been listed on the Registry for at least seven years may file a written request with the Commissioner seeking a review for the purpose of expunging an individual Registry record. The Commissioner shall grant a review upon request.
(a) (1) Except as provided in this subdivision, a person whose name has been placed on the Registry prior to July 1, 2009 and has been listed on the Registry for at least three years may file a written request with the Commissioner, seeking a review for the purpose of expunging an individual Registry record. A person whose name has been placed on the Registry on or after July 1, 2009 and has been listed on the Registry for at least seven years may file a written request with the Commissioner seeking a review for the purpose of expunging an individual Registry record. The Commissioner shall grant a review upon request.

A person who is required to register as a sex offender on the State’s Sex Offender Registry shall not be eligible to petition for expungement of his or her Registry record until the person is no longer subject to Sex Offender Registry requirements.

The person shall have the burden of proving that a reasonable person would believe that he or she no longer presents a risk to the safety or well-being of children.
(b) (1) The person shall have the burden of proving that a reasonable person would believe that he or she no longer presents a risk to the safety or well-being of children.

The Commissioner shall consider the following factors in making his or her determination:

the nature of the substantiation that resulted in the person’s name being placed on the Registry;

the number of substantiations;

the amount of time that has elapsed since the substantiation;

the circumstances of the substantiation that would indicate whether a similar incident would be likely to occur;

any activities that would reflect upon the person’s changed behavior or circumstances, such as therapy, employment, or education;

references that attest to the person’s good moral character; and

any other information that the Commissioner deems relevant.

The Commissioner may deny a petition for expungement based solely on subdivision (2)(A) or (2)(B) of this subsection.

At the review, the person who requested the review shall be provided with the opportunity to present any evidence or other information, including witnesses, that supports his or her request for expungement. Upon the person’s request, the review may be held by teleconference.

A person may seek a review under this section no more than once every 36 months.

Within 30 days of the date on which the Commissioner mailed notice of the decision pursuant to this section, a person may appeal the decision to the Human Services Board. The person shall be prohibited from challenging his or her substantiation at such hearing, and the sole issue before the Board shall be whether the Commissioner abused his or her discretion in denial of the petition for expungement. The hearing shall be on the record below, and determinations of credibility of witnesses made by the Commissioner shall be given deference by the Board.

The Department shall take steps to provide reasonable notice to persons on the Registry of their right to seek an expungement under this section. Actual notice is not required. Reasonable steps may include activities such as the production of an informative fact sheet about the expungement process, posting of such information on the Department website, and other approaches typically taken by the Department to inform the public about the Department’s activities and policies. The Department shall send notice of the expungement process to any person listed on the Registry for whom a Registry check has been requested.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2007; amended

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2015, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 10, 2016.

Particular cases.

In reversing a decision including a mother in the child protection registry on the ground that there had been a risk of harm to the child but that no purpose would be served by placing the mother’s name in the registry, the Human Services Board failed to follow the plain language of the statute. It had no discretion to conflate the two distinct statutory procedures of substantiation and expungement, and it erred in considering whether the mother was likely to commit similar acts of negligence in the future. In re R.H., 2010 VT 95, 189 Vt. 15, 14 A.3d 267, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 95 (2010).

§ 4916d.
Automatic expungement of Registry records.

Registry entries concerning a person who was substantiated for behavior occurring before the person reached 10 years of age shall be expunged when the person reaches the age of 18, provided that the person has had no additional substantiated Registry entries. A person substantiated for behavior occurring before the person reached 18 years of age and whose name has been listed on the Registry for at least three years may file a written request with the Commissioner seeking a review for the purpose of expunging an individual Registry record in accordance with section 4916c of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2007; amended

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 4916e.
Notice to minors.

If the person alleged to have abused or neglected a child is a minor, any notice required pursuant to this subchapter shall be sent:

to the minor’s parents or guardian; or

if the child is in the custody of the Commissioner, to the social worker assigned to the child by the Department and the child’s counsel of record.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2007.

§ 4917.
Multidisciplinary teams; empaneling.

The Commissioner or his or her designee may impanel a multidisciplinary team or a special investigative multitask force team, or both, wherever in the State there may be a probable case of child abuse or neglect that warrants the coordinated use of several professional services. These teams shall participate and cooperate with the local special investigation unit in compliance with

13 V.S.A. § 5415

.

The Commissioner or his or her designee, in conjunction with professionals and community agencies, shall appoint members to the multidisciplinary teams which may include persons who are trained and engaged in work relating to child abuse or neglect such as medicine, mental health, social work, nursing, child care, education, law, or law enforcement. The teams shall include a representative of the Department of Corrections. Additional persons may be appointed when the services of those persons are appropriate to any particular case.

The empaneling of a multidisciplinary or special investigative multi-task force team shall be authorized in writing and shall specifically list the members of the team. This list may be amended from time to time as needed as determined by the Commissioner or his or her designee.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2007, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2009, No. 1

, § 18, eff. March 4, 2009.

§ 4918.
Multidisciplinary teams; functions; guidelines.

Multidisciplinary teams shall assist local district offices of the Department in identifying and treating child abuse or neglect cases. With respect to any case referred to it, the team may assist the district office by providing:

case diagnosis or identification;

a comprehensive treatment plan; and

coordination of services pursuant to the treatment plan.

Multidisciplinary teams may also provide public informational and educational services to the community about identification, treatment, and prevention of child abuse and neglect. They shall also foster communication and cooperation among professionals and organizations in their community and provide such recommendations or changes in service delivery as they deem necessary.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2021, No. 20

, § 336.

§ 4919.
Disclosure of Registry records.

The Commissioner may disclose a Registry record only as follows:

To the State’s Attorney or the Attorney General.

To the owner or operator of a facility regulated by the Department for the purpose of informing the owner or operator that employment of a specific individual may result in loss of license, registration, certification, or authorization as set forth in section 152 of this title.

To an employer if such information is used to determine whether to hire or retain a specific individual providing care, custody, treatment, transportation, or supervision of children or vulnerable adults. The employer may submit a request concerning a current employee, volunteer, grantee, or contractor or an individual to whom the employer has given a conditional offer of a contract, volunteer position, or employment. The request shall be accompanied by a release signed by the current or prospective employee, volunteer, grantee, or contractor. If that individual has a record of a substantiated report, the Commissioner shall provide the Registry record to the employer. The employer shall not disclose the information contained in the Registry report.

To the Commissioners of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living and of Mental Health or their designees for purposes related to the licensing or registration of facilities regulated by those Departments.

To the Commissioners of Health, of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living and of Mental Health or their designees for purposes related to oversight and monitoring of persons who are served by or compensated with funds provided by those Departments, including persons to whom a conditional offer of employment has been made.

Upon request or when relevant to other states’ adult protective services offices.

Upon request or when relevant to other states’ child protection agencies.

To the person substantiated for child abuse and neglect who is the subject of the record.

To the Commissioner of Corrections in accordance with the provisions of

28 V.S.A. § 204a(b)(3)

.

To the Board of Medical Practice for the purpose of evaluating an applicant, licensee, or holder of certification pursuant to

26 V.S.A. § 1353

.

An employer providing transportation services to children or vulnerable adults may disclose Registry records obtained pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section to the Agency of Human Services or its designee for the sole purpose of auditing the records to ensure compliance with this subchapter. An employer shall provide such records at the request of the Agency or its designee. Only Registry records regarding individuals who provide direct transportation services or otherwise have direct contact with children or vulnerable adults may be disclosed.

Volunteers shall be considered employees for purposes of this section.

Disclosure of Registry records or information or other records used or obtained in the course of providing services to prevent child abuse or neglect or to treat abused or neglected children and their families by one member of a multidisciplinary team to another member of that team shall not subject either member of the multidisciplinary team, individually, or the team as a whole, to any civil or criminal liability notwithstanding any other provision of law.

“Employer,” as used in this section, means a person or organization that employs or contracts with one or more individuals to care for or provide transportation services to children or vulnerable adults, on either a paid or volunteer basis.

In no event shall Registry records be made available for employment purposes other than as set forth in this subsection or for credit purposes. Any person who violates this subsection shall be fined not more than $500.00.

Nothing in this subsection shall limit the Department’s right to use and disclose information from its records as provided in section 4921 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1982; amended

1983, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 100

, § 7;

2001, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 13, 2002;

2003, No. 66

, § 136b;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 121;

2007, No. 77

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2007;

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2009, No. 1

, § 37;

2011, No. 61

, § 7, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 4920.
Repealed. 2007, No. 168 (Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 4921.
Department’s records of abuse and neglect.

The Commissioner shall maintain all records of all investigations, assessments, reviews, and responses initiated under this subchapter. The Department may use and disclose information from such records in the usual course of its business, including to assess future risk to children, to provide appropriate services to the child or members of the child’s family, or for other legal purposes.

The Commissioner shall promptly inform the parents, if known, or guardian of the child that a report has been accepted as a valid allegation pursuant to subsection 4915(b) of this title and the Department’s response to the report. The Department shall inform the parent or guardian of his or her ability to request records pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. This section shall not apply if the parent or guardian is the subject of the investigation.

Upon request, the redacted investigation file shall be disclosed to:

the child’s parents, foster parent, or guardian, absent good cause shown by the Department, provided that the child’s parent, foster parent, or guardian is not the subject of the investigation;

the person alleged to have abused or neglected the child, as provided for in subsection 4916a(d) of this title; and

the attorney representing the child in a child custody proceeding in the Family Division of the Superior Court.

Upon request, Department records created under this subchapter shall be disclosed to:

the court, parties to the juvenile proceeding, and the child’s guardian ad litem if there is a pending juvenile proceeding or if the child is in the custody of the Commissioner;

the Commissioner or person designated by the Commissioner to receive such records;

persons assigned by the Commissioner to conduct investigations;

law enforcement officers engaged in a joint investigation with the Department, an Assistant Attorney General, or a State’s Attorney; and

other State agencies conducting related inquiries or proceedings.

[Repealed.]

Upon request, relevant Department records or information created under this subchapter shall be disclosed to:
(e) (1) Upon request, relevant Department records or information created under this subchapter shall be disclosed to:

a person, agency, or organization, including a multidisciplinary team empaneled under section 4917 of this title, authorized to diagnose, care for, treat, or supervise a child or family who is the subject of a report or record created under this subchapter, or who is responsible for the child’s health or welfare;

health and mental health care providers working directly with the child or family who is the subject of the report or record;

educators working directly with the child or family who is the subject of the report or record;

licensed or approved foster caregivers for the child;

mandated reporters as defined by section 4913 of this subchapter, making a report in accordance with the provisions of section 4914 of this subchapter and engaging in an ongoing working relationship with the child or family who is the subject of the report;

a Family Division of the Superior Court involved in any proceeding in which:

custody of a child or parent-child contact is at issue pursuant to 15 V.S.A. chapter 11, subchapter 3A;

a parent of a child challenges a presumption of parentage under 15C V.S.A. § 402(b)(3); or

a parent of a child contests an allegation that he or she fostered or supported a bonded and dependent relationship between the child and a person seeking to be adjudicated a de facto parent under 15C V.S.A. § 501(a)(2);

a Probate Division of the Superior Court involved in guardianship proceedings;

other governmental entities for purposes of child protection.

Determinations of relevancy shall be made by the Department.

In providing records or information under this subsection (e), the Department may withhold:

information that could compromise the safety of the reporter or the child or family who is the subject of the report; or

specific details that could cause the child to experience significant mental or emotional stress.

In providing records or information under this section, the Department may also provide other records related to its child protection activities for the child.

Any persons or agencies authorized to receive confidential information under this section may share such information with other persons or agencies authorized to receive confidential information under this section for the purposes of providing services and benefits to the children and families those persons or agencies mutually serve.

Upon request, relevant Department information created under this subchapter may be disclosed to a parent with a reasonable concern that an individual who is residing at least part time with the parent requestor’s child presents a risk of abuse or neglect to the requestor’s child. As it is used in this subsection, “relevant Department information” shall mean information regarding the individual that the Department determines could avert the risk of harm presented by the individual to the requestor’s child. If the Department denies the request for information, the requestor may petition the Family Division of the Superior Court, which may, after weighing the privacy concerns of the individuals involved with the parent’s right to protect his or her child, order the release of the information.

Any records or information disclosed under this section and information relating to the contents of those records or reports shall not be disseminated by the receiving persons or agencies to any persons or agencies, other than to those persons or agencies authorized to receive information pursuant to this section. A person who intentionally violates the confidentiality provisions of this section shall be fined not more than $2,000.00.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 17; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2015, No. 60

, § 5;

2017, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 4922.
Rulemaking.

The Commissioner shall develop rules to implement this subchapter. These shall include:

rules setting forth criteria for determining whether to conduct an assessment or an investigation;

rules setting out procedures for assessment and service delivery;

rules outlining procedures for investigations;

rules for conducting the administrative review conference;

rules regarding access to and maintenance of Department records of investigations, assessments, reviews, and responses; and

rules regarding the tiered Registry as required by section 4916 of this title.

The rules shall strike an appropriate balance between protecting children and respecting the rights of a parent or guardian, including a parent or guardian with disabilities, and shall recognize that persons with a disability can be successful parents. The rules shall include the possible use of adaptive equipment and supports.

These rules shall be adopted no later than July 1, 2009.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 4923.
Reporting.

The Commissioner shall publish an annual report regarding reports of child abuse and neglect no later than June 30, for the previous year. The report shall include:

The number of reports accepted as valid allegations of child abuse or neglect.

The number of reports that resulted in an investigative response; particularly:

the number of investigations that resulted in a substantiation;

the types of maltreatment substantiated;

the relationship of the perpetrator to the victim, by category; and

the gender and age group of the substantiated victims.

The number of reports that resulted in an assessment response; particularly:

the general types of maltreatment alleged in cases that received an assessment response; and

the number of assessments that resulted in the recommendation of services.

Trend information over a five-year period. Beginning with the adoption of the assessment response and continuing over the next five years, the report shall explain the impact of the assessment response on statistical reporting.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.